Washington statutes.
RCW 31.12.891

Automated teller machines and night depositories security.

Chapter 19.174 RCW applies to automated teller machines and night depositories regulated under this title.

[ 1993 c 324 s 11. Formerly RCW 31.12.740.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1993 c 324: See RCW 19.174.900.